




SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH 2010 FUND, L.P. - Pooled Investment Fund- Sc China Growth 2010 Management, L.P.  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH 2010 FUND, L.P.

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    3000 Sand Hill Road Building 4, Suite 250 
    Menlo Park, CA, 94025Phone: 650-854-3927 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2011-05-23


Amended


$604,000,000


$604,000,000


Other


06 3C 3C.1 3C.7


SEC link




	2010-06-07


New


Yet to Sell


$0


Other


06 3C 3C.1 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 General Partner Sc China Growth 2010 Management, L.P. 
 Promoter 















SC CHINA CO-INVESTMENT 2011-A, L.P. - Pooled Investment Fund- Sc China Growth 2010 Management, L.P.  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









SC CHINA CO-INVESTMENT 2011-A, L.P.

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    3000 Sand Hill Road Building 4, Suite 250 
    Menlo Park, CA, 94025Phone: 650-854-3927 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2012-06-13


Amended


$94,600,000


$94,600,000


Other


06 3C 3C.1 3C.7


SEC link




	2011-06-16


New


Yet to Sell


$0


Other


06 3C 3C.1 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 General Partner Sc China Growth 2010 Management, L.P. 
 Promoter 












S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 11:17 AM ET
Household Products

Company Overview of S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. manufactures, markets, and sells household products to customers. It offers products in the categories that include home cleaning, fresher and hygienic, air care and home fragrance, pest control, home storage, shoe care, auto care, and professional products. The company sells its products online; and through groceries, drug stores, mass merchandisers, convenience stores, and mom-and-pop shops worldwide. S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. was formerly known as S. C. Johnson Wax Inc. and changed its name to S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. in 1906. The company was founded in 1886 and is based in Racine, Wisconsin. It has locations and operations in Africa, Asia, Australia/New Zealand...
S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. manufactures, markets, and sells household products to customers. It offers products in the categories that include home cleaning, fresher and hygienic, air care and home fragrance, pest control, home storage, shoe care, auto care, and professional products. The company sells its products online; and through groceries, drug stores, mass merchandisers, convenience stores, and mom-and-pop shops worldwide. S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. was formerly known as S. C. Johnson Wax Inc. and changed its name to S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. in 1906. The company was founded in 1886 and is based in Racine, Wisconsin. It has locations and operations in Africa, Asia, Australia/New Zealand, Europe, North America, Latin America, and internationally.
Detailed Description


1525 Howe StreetRacine, WI 53403United StatesFounded in 1886



Phone: 262-260-2000

Fax: 262-260-6004

www.scjohnson.com







Key Executives for S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc.




Dr. H. Fisk Johnson Ph.D.


      	Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 59
        







Mr. Mark H. Eckhardt


      	Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 
      








Mr. Salman Amin


      	Chief Operating Officer
      


Age: 57
        







Mr. McKaskle B. Renée


      	Vice President and Chief Information Officer
      








Mr. Rocky Perga


      	Director of Planning, Administration, and Architecture
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. Key Developments

Mon'delez Rus LLC may sell its plant for the production of chocolate to S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc.
Nov 23 16
Mon'delez Rus LLC a subsidiary of Mondelez International, the US intends to sell a plant for the production of chocolate (Prichuda wafer cakes, Picnic bars, Alpen Gold Composition chocolates) in Chudovo (the Novgorod region, North-West) to S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. The production of confectionery products in Chudovo will be terminated no later than Q3 2017. The deal value is not disclosed. The company attributes the decision to sell the asset to the intention to improve the efficiency of investments in production facilities in Russia.


Sealed Air Corporation and SC Johnson & Son to End Existing Brand License Agreement
Oct 17 16
Sealed Air Corporation and SC Johnson & Son (SCJ) announced that they have reached a mutual agreement to end the existing business relating to Sealed Air’s distribution of SCJ branded products to the professional market under the existing Brand License Agreement. The parties agreed that the BLA will expire on May 2, 2017, with the exception of Australia, New Zealand, Argentina, Chile, Czech Republic and Poland, where the BLA will expire on January 1, 2017. Both parties are committed to maintaining a continuous supply of SCJ branded products to customers under the BLA.


S. C. Johnson Launches New Glade Autumn Collection Fragrances
Sep 16 16
S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc. has announced the launch of new Glade Autumn Collection fragrances. Understanding the powerful connection between scent and emotion, Glade designed each of the three new fragrances from the Glade Autumn Collection - Spiced Apple Magic, Wondrous Autumn Nights and Rich Pumpkin Dream - with complex fragrance blends, like patchouli autumn blossoms, leather and mint to help consumers explore all the season has to offer. In addition to inspiring your personal style, the Glade Autumn Collection fragrances can help you achieve a more mysterious and glamour-infused ambiance in your home this season. The Glade Autumn Collection fragrances are now available in multiple formats, including Jar Candles, Automatic Sprays, PlugIns Scented Oils, Wax Melts and Premium Room Sprays, and can be found in the air care aisle of most food, drug and mass-merchandise stores.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 1st Ayd Corporation United States A Tail We Could Wag, Inc. United States A&B Wiper Supply, Inc. United States A&E Cage Company, LLC United States A.B.C. Compounding Company, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Private Placement

			      June 13, 2017
			    
Clean Hands Safe Hands LLC





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact S. C. Johnson & Son, Inc., please visit www.scjohnson.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P.
Check out list of companies and businesses related to GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P.. Find out GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. address and contact details. View other people related to GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

2800 SAND HILL ROAD SUITE 101 MENLO PARK 94025 CA




Companies related to GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P.
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001666130SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH FUND IV, L.P.2800 SAND HILL ROAD SUITE 101 MENLO PARK 940250001666131SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH PARTNERS FUND IV, L.P.2800 SAND HILL ROAD SUITE 101 MENLO PARK 940250001666132SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH IV PRINCIPALS FUND, L.P.2800 SAND HILL ROAD SUITE 101 MENLO PARK 94025




GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. on the Web
Persons related to GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. - SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH FUND IV, L.P.NamePositionCityGENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P.MENLO PARKPersons related to GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. - SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH PARTNERS FUND IV, L.P.NamePositionCityGENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P.MENLO PARKPersons related to GENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P. - SEQUOIA CAPITAL CHINA GROWTH IV PRINCIPALS FUND, L.P.NamePositionCityGENERAL PARTNER  SC CHINA GROWTH IV MANAGEMENT, L.P.MENLO PARK
Potentially same personNameCityCountryPartner  GeneralNew YorkNYPartner  GeneralNew YorkNY












 








Ares :: Our Business :: Private Equity :: North American and European Flexible Capital :: Portfolio






























 Global Alternative Investments
 Unique Opportunities
 Demonstrated Performance


























Ares
Our Business
Private Equity
North American and European Flexible Capital
Portfolio



Private Equity
North American and European Flexible Capital








NEWS: 
Ares Management Raises $7.85 Billion For Fifth Flexible Capital Private Equity Fund

Read more >


Contact Private Equity:

1-800-940-6347

Contact Us or Call 1-800-940-6347 (US) or 310-921-7201 (International)







Overview




Targeted Investments




Value Proposition




Portfolio




Key Contacts







While open to pursuing investments in a range of industries, we specifically target market-leading businesses that demonstrate attractive long-term growth prospects. We aim to balance our portfolios with a diverse mix of industries and types of securities. The table below lists our platform equity investments to date.






Current Portfolio of Equity Investments *


Please click on an investment name to open the company’s website in a separate window.




Company Name


Initial Investment


Industry


Hq Location


Description




 



2012


Retail


CA


Extreme value retailer of everyday merchandise




 



2015


Industrial


NC


Largest replacement tire distributor in North America




 



2006


Healthcare Services


NY


Dental practice management company




 



2014


Energy


TX


Independent oil and gas exploration and development company




 



2012


Healthcare Services


UT


Healthcare staffing services




 



2010


Building Products


CA


Homebuilder in California coastal communities




 



2016


Energy


TX


Independent oil and gas exploration and development company




 



2013


Building Products


PA


Manufacturer of premium low maintenance building products







2017


Energy


TX


Provider of development capital to upstream oil and gas operators




 



2014


Consumer Products


United Kingdom


Manufacturer and retailer of premium paints and wallpaper




 



2010


Retail


GA


Big box retailer of hard surface flooring products




 



2017


Energy


TX


Independent oil and gas exploration and development company




 



2008


Retail


CA


Leading retailer of music products in the United States




 



2014


Energy


TX


Independent oil and gas exploration and development company




 



2012


Business Services


GA


Provider of IT staffing solutions




 



2007


Building Products


CA


Manufacturer of bath and spa products




 



2014


Building Products


United Kingdom


Greater London focused residential homebuilder




 



2014


Healthcare Services


CA


Owner/operator of freestanding veterinary hospitals




 



2013


Retail


TX


Largest global omni-channel luxury retailer




 



2013


Healthcare Services


SC


Largest provider of outsourced OB Hospitalist programs




 



2010


Consumer Products


GA


Manufacturer and distributor of bedding products




 



2012


Retail


CA


Warehouse-style discount retailer




 



2011


Aerospace and Defense


VA


National security technology company




 



2013


Healthcare Services


FL


Largest provider of practice management services to OB/GYNs




 



2015


Facilities Services


FL


Leading national provider of value-added amenity services to the multifamily housing industry







2017


Energy


TX


Independent oil and gas exploration and development company






*The platform investments represent substantially (excluding toe-hold) all of the Ares existing platform companies. Actual holdings for each Ares fund may vary and there is no guarantee that a particular Ares fund will hold any or all of the platform investments above. It should not be assumed that an investment in the platform companies was or will be profitable.









© 2017 Ares Management, L.P.


Terms of Use


Privacy Policy


Legal Disclosures


Site Map




























Growth – Internal Market, Industry, Entrepreneurship and SMEs - European Commission










































Skip to main content







Legal notice
Cookies
Contact
Search
 


Bulgarian
Czech
Danish
German
Estonian
Greek
Current language: en
Spanish
French
Irish
Croatian
Icelandic
Italian
Latvian
Lithuanian
Hungarian
Maltese
Dutch
Norwegian Nynorsk
Polish
Portuguese, International
Romanian
Slovak
Slovenian
Finnish
Swedish
 







Growth
Internal Market, Industry, Entrepreneurship and SMEs






Home 
                   Menu                 









European Commission > Growth 








 EU LoginCreate an EU Login account








          Growth – Internal Market, Industry, Entrepreneurship and SMEs        



    Main menu  


HomeAbout us
Contact us
Newsletter
Features
RSS feeds
Cookies
Legal notice

Single Market and StandardsSingle Market Strategy
Single Market for Goods
Single Market for Services
Digital Single Market
European Standards
Barriers to Trade
CE marking
Public Procurement
Single Market Forum

IndustryIndustrial Policy
Competitiveness
Innovation
Digital transformation
Key Enabling Technologies
Sustainability and circular economy
Intellectual Property
Corporate Social Responsibility
International Activities

Entrepreneurship and SMEsBusiness-friendly environment
Promoting entrepreneurship
Improving access to markets
Clusters
SME support
COSME programme

Access to finance for SMEsCOSME financial instruments
CIP Financial Instruments
Policy areas
Data and surveys - SAFE
EU Access to Finance Days

SectorsAeronautics industries
Automotive industry
Biotechnology
Chemicals
Construction
Cosmetics
Defence Industries
Electrical and Electronic Engineering Industries
Food and drink industry
Gambling
Healthcare Industries
Maritime Industries
Mechanical Engineering
Medical devices
Postal services
Pressure and Gas
Raw materials, metals, minerals and forest-based industries
Social economy
Space
Textiles, Fashion and Creative Industries
Tourism
Toys


























   

   

   

   










 














 



    About us  

Who we areContact us 









    News and events  










 



The online Single Market Scoreboard, published today, shows that whilst most barriers to the free movement of persons, services, goods and capital are being eliminated, in some fields the situation is stalling or even worsening.
 
 
 
 
 
 


 



The EU's innovation performance last year continued to grow despite somewhat uneven progress observed around Europe.
 
 
 
 
 
 


 



The findings of the Eurobarometer survey on chemical safety were presented at the Helsinki chemicals forum. The study reveals REACH's impact.
 
 
 
 
 
 


 



We're launching a European Defence Fund to help EU countries spend taxpayer money more efficiently, reduce duplications in spending, and get better value for money.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 






Single Market Scoreboard: EU countries compliance with EU law not yet good enough

 



EU innovation: some improvements but more even progress is needed

 



Consumer confidence in chemicals improving after 10 years of REACH

 



A European Defence Fund: €5.5 billion per year

 
 



All news


Events


Newsletter


Features



 

 
 
 








    Commissioner, EU SME Envoy  

Elżbieta Bieńkowska 



    The Single Market Strategy  


The Single Market Strategy is the European Commission’s plan to unlock the full po­ten­tial of the Single Market, creating more opportunities for people and business.A deeper and fairer Single MarketCommunicationFact sheet 









    Tools and support  


Calls for tendersCalls for proposalsYour Europe for citizensYour Europe for businessesEnterprise Europe NetworkSOLVIT – your EU rightsCOSME – support and funding for SMEs 



    Legislation and standards  



CE markingREACH 


European standards: 
Products  
          Active implantable medical devices    
          Cableway installations    
          Chemical substances (REACH)    
          Construction products (CPD/CPR)    
          Cosmetic products    
          Ecodesign - Boilers    
          Ecodesign - Electric motors    
          Ecodesign - Energy-related products    
          Ecodesign - Fans    
          Ecodesign - Power supplies    
          Ecodesign - Set-top boxes    
          Ecodesign - Standby and off mode    
          Ecodesign - Transformers    
          Ecodesign - Water pumps    
          Ecodesign and Energy Labelling    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling  – Domestic ovens, hobs and range hoods    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Air conditioners and comfort fans    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Circulators    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Directional and LED lamps    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - dishwashers    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Fluorescent lamps    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Household lamps    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Refrigerating appliances    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - television    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - tumble driers    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Vacuum cleaners    
          Ecodesign and energy labelling - Washing machines    
          Electromagnetic compatibility (EMC)    
          Energy Labelling - Washer-driers (combined)    
          Energy Labelling – Ovens    
          Equipment for explosive atmospheres (ATEX)    
          Explosives for civil uses    
          Gas appliances    
          General product safety    
          In vitro diagnostic medical devices    
          Inspection of pesticide application equipment    
          Lifts    
          Low voltage (LVD)    
          Machinery (MD)    
          Measuring instruments (MID)    
          Medical devices    
          Non-automatic weighing instruments (NAWI)    
          Packaging and packaging waste    
          Personal protective equipment    
          Postal services    
          Pressure equipment    
          Pyrotechnic articles    
          Radio equipment    
          Rail system: interoperability    
          Recreational craft    
          Restriction of the use of certain hazardous substances (RoHS)    
          Simple pressure vessels    
          The new legislative framework and the eco-management audit scheme    
          Toy safety  



 




Conformity assessment bodies (NANDO): 
Countries  
          Australia    
          Austria    
          Belgium    
          Bulgaria    
          Canada    
          Croatia    
          Cyprus    
          Czech Republic    
          Denmark    
          Estonia    
          Finland    
          France    
          Germany    
          Greece    
          Hungary    
          Iceland    
          Ireland    
          Italy    
          Japan    
          Latvia    
          Liechtenstein    
          Lithuania    
          Luxembourg    
          Malta    
          Netherlands    
          New Zealand    
          Norway    
          Poland    
          Portugal    
          Romania    
          Slovakia    
          Slovenia    
          Spain    
          Sweden    
          Switzerland    
          Turkey    
          United Kingdom    
          United States Of America  



 
 
 







    Reports and consultations  

Public consultationsRetail regulations in a multi-channel environmentDetergents regulation in the context of its ex-post evaluationMore consultationsReportsPublic support measures for connected and automated drivingMore reports 
















Stay connected:Follow EU_Growth on TwitterFacebookGoogle+Our YouTube channel 



  Last update: 28/07/2017 | Legal notice
Cookies
Contact
Search
 | Top 














Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













CFO Team - Early Growth Financial Services
















CFO Team







Home>>
Who We Are>>












Duncan Seay
Fund-Level CFO
Duncan Seay is an accomplished serial entrepreneur and CFO with a successful track record of starting and growing businesses in consumer technology, consumer goods, Internet, mobile and e-commerce industries. His areas of financial expertise include financial modeling, financial analysis, forecasting, budgeting, investor due diligence, pricing analysis, corporate finance, and early-stage fundraising. Separate from his financial strengths, Duncan is equally skilled in strategic planning, operational management, business development, customer acquisition, and sales & marketing execution.

Duncan began his early career at Ernst & Young in their auditing and M&A groups where he earned his CPA. During his time at E&Y, Duncan conducted extensive due diligence for a number of toy and software company acquisitions, while also working on multiple software company IPO’s. After leaving E&Y, Duncan co-founded a number of early stage consumer companies where he served as the CFO, CEO and/or COO: CFO at Dr. McDougall’s Rights Foods (CPG wholesale); CEO/CFO at eMeals (subscription commerce); Managing Director at Capogee Venture Advisors (technology investment banking); CEO/CFO at VCLocator (fintech commerce); CFO & COO at Crayons Beverages (CPG wholesale); Venture Partner at SC Ventures (a family office venture fund); and CEO/CFO at Evergram (a consumer-tech messaging company).

Duncan prides himself on being a true partner to senior operating executives and company Boards in solving business issues, leading organizations through transformation and facilitating exit events for investors and shareholders.

Duncan received a BSBA from Washington University in St. Louis with concentrations in Accounting, Finance and Economics.

Based: Bay Area









Keith Corbin
Fund-Level CFO
Keith Corbin is a financial executive with over 30 years of experience encompassing financial operations, capital management, fund raising and mergers and acquisitions. He has significant record of success generating new ideas and driving rapid business growth for emerging enterprises and early stage companies. He has a proven ability to develop organizational vision and oversee financial operations. He is a strategic thinker adept at cultivating profitable rapport with internal and external stakeholders. As a CFO he has consistently achieved and exceeded company business targets. He has both domestic and international experience and a broad industry base upon which to draw.
His diversified industry experience encompasses Financial Services (including Venture Capital), Technology (infrastructure, Software and IT), Consumer Medical Devices and Business Services. He also has in depth experience in a variety of business models including direct to consumer, business to business, services and SaaS.

Over the past 15 years he has served in both consulting and regular full time CFO roles with emerging companies. His leadership has been instrumental in helping to facilitate rapid growth, operational efficiency and successful M&A transactions for multiple companies. Examples include Eargo, Inc. a new innovative hearing aid company (raising over $35M in two VC rounds of financing); IC Compliance, a specialized business providing compliance services to many high profile Silicon Valley companies (grew from $30M to $100M in two years, followed by sale to a private equity firm); and Zecco, a self-directed broker dealer (successfully merged with “peer-like” company). Early in his career Keith spent six years with Deloitte & Touche, later serving as VP of International Finance for a large multi-national contingent staffing firm and CFO for an IT services company successfully completing their IPO.

Based: Bay Area









Stephen Terry
Fund-Level CFO
Steve is an experienced finance executive with a 25+ year track record in senior roles at startups, Fortune 500 technology companies and venture capital funds. He has significant experience in fundraising, ranging from angel and venture capital to debt financing and initial public offerings. Steve has particular expertise supporting startups with growth and cross border issues and with venture capital funds and investments. His industry experience includes Clean Tech, services/consulting, manufacturing, hardware, autonomous vehicles, telecommunications, enterprise SaaS, internet, natural resources, aerospace, utilities, energy and venture capital.

Prior to joining EGFS, Steve was the CFO of Azure International, a consulting and analytics company which helps technology companies and venture/PE funds expand internationally, with an emphasis on China. There he served as consulting and interim CFO for several of Azure’s portfolio and partner companies, leading many successful fund raising efforts and several successful exits. Steve also concurrently served as CFO of Azure’s affiliated venture capital fund where he led all investment, portfolio management, accounting, reporting, compliance and investor relations functions. Previously he was an investment banker at Goldman Sachs based in the US and Europe, where he focused on technology company fund raising and M&A.

Steve is an avid participant in the entrepreneurial ecosystem of the Bay Area: He is on the organizing committees for the MIT Alumni Club of Northern California Technology and Energy & Environment tracks and is active with the MIT Alumni Angels and Bay Angels investor networks. He also serves as a mentor for startups at several incubators and accelerators, including Chinaccelerator, HAX Accelerator, and the Cleantech Open.

Steve graduated from MIT with an engineering degree and holds the Chartered Financial Analyst designation. He is proficient in Mandarin Chinese.

Based: Bay Area









Sirk Roh
Consulting CFO
Sirk is an accomplished finance executive focused on leading early-stage companies through strategic financial decisions. His areas of expertise include debt and equity financings, planning/budgeting, financial analysis, cash flow management, high growth management, and cost reductions/right-sizing, when needed.

Sirk brings more than 25 years of experience to Early Growth Financial Services, including 17 years of financial leadership roles with high-tech companies. His early-stage company experience includes: CFO at Nuezra, an IT consulting company; VP Finance at Kovio, a semiconductor printing innovator; CFO at Gale Technologies, a leader in testing automation software; VP Finance at Attune Systems and Controller at Nishan Systems, both data storage networking manufacturers. Prior to focusing on early-stage companies, Sirk held positions as Controller for the Palm Operating System division and several divisions within 3Com.

Sirk holds an MBA in Finance from UCLA’s Anderson School of Business and a BA in Business Economics from UC Santa Barbara.

Based: Bay Area









Mike Hilberman
Consulting CFO
Mike brings to EGFS over twenty years of executive leadership and consulting experience in assisting both large and small organizations through difficult realignments of their strategy, finances, and business processes. Mike’s expertise includes aligning business strategy, improving operations, and driving both top- and bottom-line financial performance for all types of businesses. Mike is also an expert in financial modeling and developing scenario-based financial forecasts.

Mike began his career at Booz, Allen & Hamilton, successfully helping large Fortune 500 companies like Chevron, Mobil Oil, Apple, Fox, First Nationwide and Bechtel. While consulting at M Squared, he helped Cisco on a series of programs including incubating and growing a multi-billion dollar sales initiative. He has also held a variety of management positions within small companies, and has been an outside advisor to over a dozen start-ups.

Mike also served as Senior Director of Financial Business Technology at Levi Strauss & Company, reporting directly to both the CFO and the CIO, managing all finance related technology initiatives. At Corrigo, a small startup focused on mobile workforce management which was backed by CMGI, Mike served on an interim basis as both the VP of Sales and the VP of Finance, taking responsibility to restructure the company’s debt and work with new venture money to put the company back on stable footing for continued growth through the full dot-com era bubble.

Mike received an MBA in finance, marketing, strategy, and entrepreneurship from the Kellogg School of Management at Northwestern, and a BA in economics, mathematics, and psychology from Claremont McKenna College.

Based: Bay Area









Steven Olson
Consulting CFO
Steven is a senior finance and operations executive with more than 25 years of executive-level management experience, specifically within technology-focused organizations. His specialties include: enterprise software/SaaS, international setup, M&A, raising capital, financial planning and modeling, and mergers.

In his position as Managing Principal at New Venture Support, Inc., Steven provided CFO/COO support for early-stage companies and new ventures, with a focus on raising investment capital, international expansion, organizational infrastructure, financial planning and analysis. Previously, as Vice President Finance of Dexterra, Inc., an enterprise mobile software company, Steven raised $106M in venture funding and built global corporate and financial infrastructure to support international operations. Prior to that, as Vice President, Financial Consulting for Corollary Solutions, a customer management solutions provider, Steven removed over $12M in costs in the first year after re-engineering, and moved Compaq from #5 to #2 in the market for customer satisfaction.

Steven has also served as Director, Support Operations for Conxion, Vice President Operations for Brigade Corporation; Vice-President, Business Operations for Telepost Inc.; General Manager for Techmar; Vice President, Chief Financial Officer for Softbank Inc.; CFO for PC-SIG/Spectra Publishing; and Controller/Operations Manager for Pacific Data Group, Inc.

Steven holds an MBA in International Business from Santa Clara University and a BS in Business Finance from San Jose State University.

Based: Bay Area









Alaa Ismail
Consulting CFO
Alaa is an accomplished CFO with two decades of finance, management and operating experience with Internet, Software, SaaS, Hardware and Services companies.

Prior to Joining Early Growth Financial Services, Alaa ran his own finance consultancy, providing accounting and financial guidance to emerging and high growth Companies.

Alaa began his finance career at Arthur Anderson where he gained significant experience in mergers and acquisitions ranging from financial compliance of definitive agreements and due diligence. Alaa spent 10 years at Aptix Corp., where he helped the company grow from a small start-up to a company generating $60 million in sales with over 250 employees.  Alaa sold Aptix to a major competitor in 2005.

Alaa is a CPA (inactive) and has a BA in Economics from UCLA.

Based: Bay Area









David Chu
Consulting CFO
David Chu comes to EGFS with almost 20 years of global experience in financial management, investment analysis, and entrepreneurship. With his comprehensive investment background, David’s insight and value-oriented approach are of particular value to entrepreneurs, in fundraising and beyond. His areas of expertise include financial modeling, financial analysis, forecasting, budgeting, investor due diligence, pricing analysis, fundraising, product positioning, and compensation planning.

Prior to joining EGFS, David generated investment ideas and opportunities for his clients, first as a Managing Director at LAB Advisors and most recently as a Vice President at Merlin Securities in San Francisco. Prior to that, David co-founded Soma Asset Management, a long-short hedge fund investing across the capital structure. David also worked as a securities analyst at Scion Capital, a fundamental analysis, deep-value hedge fund. While at Scion, David launched the firm’s Hong Kong office and served as the company’s Executive Director.

David has a strong background in management consultancy and private equity, with experience both nationally and internationally, as a Research Associate at Abacus Capital Investments, an investment banker at Goldman Sachs in New York, and a private equity executive in Singapore with Equinox Capital.

David received his MBA from Harvard Business School and graduated magna cum laude from Georgetown University with a BSBA degree in Finance and International Business.

Based: Bay Area









Shelli O'Neal
Consulting CFO
Shelli O’Neal joins the EGFS with 20+ years experience as a finance professional. As a CFO, Controller, and Finance Manager for a wide variety of companies, Shelli’s expertise includes budgeting, financial reporting, cash analysis, revenue recognition, SEC reporting, and corporate tax.

Prior to joining EGFS, Shelli was a consultant, working with startups to larger companies to support their accounting and finance functions. Previous positions include Controller for Tela Innovations, Inc.; Owner/Controller Consultant for Finance Solutions, Inc.; Controller for Chelsio Communications; Manager, Venture Capital Tax for Deloitte & Touche; Manager, Corporate Finance for Xilinx; Finance Manager for Quantum; and Audit and Tax Professional for Deloitte.

Shelli holds her BS in Accounting from California State University-Hayward, School of Business and Economics.

Based: Bay Area









David Horning
Consulting CFO
David Horning is an experienced finance professional with a strong technical and analytical background. His expertise is in helping technology-focused companies in the areas of financial forecasting, strategic planning and risk management.

David began his career as a Mechanical Engineer and Project Manager at Capstone Turbine where he led a team in the design and development of a new product line of gas turbine engines. He also worked as an investment professional at Palo Alto Investors where he invested in both public companies and private VC-funded start-ups.

Prior to joining EGFS David worked as an independent CFO consultant to a number of start-ups in the Bay Area. In this role he helped his clients with equity and debt financing, budgeting and reporting, financial modeling and forecasting, cash management, strategic planning, deal negotiation, M&A due diligence, divestitures and business valuation analysis.

David received a Ph.D. in Mechanical Engineering and M.S. in Management Science and Engineering from Stanford University, and his M.S. and B.S. degrees in Mechanical Engineering from the University of Washington. He has also been a Chartered Financial Analyst charterholder since 2005.

Based: Bay Area









Jayant Ishwar
Consulting CFO
Jayant Ishwar is a proven financial executive with extensive start-up experience. He brings more than 20 years of financial and corporate experience in both startup and established companies. He has raised venture financing of over $50 million for private companies. He has also arranged venture debt and equipment leases. He has negotiated and executed company exits. He assisted in raising over $500 million in equity and convertible debt for a large public company. He possesses strong planning, operating and M&A experience. He is experienced in dealing with law firms, in matters of corporate law, patent filings and patent litigation.

Jayant is currently a Consulting CFO at Early Stage Financial Services. He has worked in a similar role at a number of small software and semiconductor companies from 2010 onwards: raising capital, managing finance and administration, and providing support for the acquisition of two client companies by assisting in the due diligence process and dealing with law firms involved on both sides.

Previously, as CFO at Nanoconduction Inc., he set up the G&A function and managed all finance and administrative activities. Prior to that position, he was CFO at Herodion Corp., a semiconductor IP company that was bought by the leading competitor in the industry. Before joining Herodion, Jayant was VP, Finance at O2Micro, where he led the company through a successful IPO on Nasdaq. Previously, he held executive and senior management positions at Silicon Graphics, Grimes Company and Mitchell Madison Group.

Jayant received a B.S. in electrical engineering from Indian Institute of Technology and an M.B.A. from Harvard Business School.

Based: Bay Area









Raj Sinkar
Consulting CFO
Raj Sinkar has over 10 years of experience spanning finance, investments, and entrepreneurship.  His areas of expertise include financial modeling, financial analysis, forecasting, budgeting, due diligence, and fundraising.

Raj started his career at Alan Biller and Associates, where he served as an investment consultant to institutional and high net worth investors.  His investment recommendations led to over $5 billion in allocations.  As a research analyst at Palo Alto Investors, he evaluated and recommended investments in public companies and early-stage start-ups across several industries, including technology, business services, financial services, consumer, healthcare, and energy.  Raj joined Producers Forum, an early-stage start up, as VP of Finance and Operations.  His responsibilities included financial planning and analysis, strategy, customer acquisition, customer success, product development, product testing, and fundraising.  As a Principal at Weber Capital Management, Raj evaluated investments in public micro-cap technology companies and led the firm’s first-ever institutional fundraising effort.

Raj received an MBA from Golden Gate University and a BS in Electrical Engineering from UC Santa Barbara.  He is a CFA charterholder and a member of the CFA Society of San Francisco.  He is also a regular contributor to The Startup Edge, an online magazine focused on entrepreneurship, start-ups, and technology.

Based: Bay Area









Todd Spartz
Consulting CFO
Todd brings an extensive background in technology financial management to EGFS, including deep experience in strategic planning, financial analysis, performance management, capital raising, mergers & acquisitions, systems’ implementations, revenue recognition/deal negotiation, and international operations.

Most recently, Todd was CFO of Determine Software (Nasdaq: DTRM) where he successfully transitioned the Company from an on-premise perpetual software developer to SaaS, raised significant debt and equity, and acquired two private software developers.  Prior to that, he was CFO for Nomis Solutions, an emerging VC-backed price optimization software vendor.  Earlier experience includes VP of Finance for Openwave Systems, VP of Finance for Experian, and various senior finance roles at Oblix (acquired by Oracle), Extreme Networks, Aspect Communications, and Applied Materials.

Todd holds an MBA from Santa Clara University, a BSC in Accounting from DePaul University and is a CPA (Active) in California.

Based: Bay Area









Isabelle Fymat
Consulting CFO
Isabelle is a senior strategic & operational executive focused on helping early-stage companies build a solid foundation through their financial decisions.  With 20+ years of experience working with young companies, including 15 years in venture capital and public market investing, she brings solid experience working with startups to support the fundraising process including helping clients with the positioning, pitch deck, board deck and executive summary.  Her areas of expertise also include strategic planning, forecasting, top-down/bottom-up and scenario modeling, budgeting, cash flow management and reporting.

Prior to joining EGFS, Isabelle spent 10 years at Crosslink Capital, a leader in venture capital and public investing, most recently as General Partner in charge of investing in Internet, ecommerce, consumer services and digital media industries.  She also has extensive experience with software (SaaS) and services industries.  Prior to that she spent several years in research at Goldman Sachs and Bear Stearns, as well as advising Fortune 500 companies on their investment and digital strategies through DiamondCluster International.

Isabelle holds an MBA in Finance & Accounting from UCLA’s Anderson School of Business and a BA in Communications & Marketing from The University of Pennsylvania.

Based:  Bay Area









Paul Meyer
Consulting CFO
Paul Meyer is an experienced finance executive with a 25+ year track record in senior roles at start-ups and Fortune 500 technology companies. He has significant experience in fundraising from angel and venture capital to leasing/debt financing and initial public offerings. For the past six years, he has run a CFO consulting practice, focused on early stage to mid-market technology companies in the greater Los Angeles area.

Most recently, he was the CFO of Cynvenio Biosystems, Inc., an early stage medical device company. He was also General Manager of their plastic consumables manufacturing business, BioMolded Products LLC. During much of his career, Paul was with Interlink Electronics [NASDAQ:LINK] a developer of intuitive interface technologies for business and home applications, serving for sixteen years as CFO and Executive Vice President. He joined Interlink as CFO when it was a start-up with 25 employees, managed its transition through an IPO, and oversaw its growth for over 10 years as a public company to more than 200 employees worldwide, establishing offices in the US, Japan, China and Taiwan.

He is an avid participant in the entrepreneurial ecosystem of greater Los Angeles: He is the incoming President of Tech Coast Angels (Central Coast chapter), the Vice Chair of the MIT Enterprise Forum of Santa Barbara, a Technical Advisor for the Ventura Ventures Technology Center (V2TC) tech incubator, Founder and Chair of the Tech Industry Roundtable of Ventura County, Founder and Chair of the Entrepreneurial Speaker Series at the Ventura BioCenter life science incubator, Chief Financial Advisor for the Cal X-Stars life science incubator and Board Member of the Business & Technology Partnership of CSU Channel Islands.

Starting his career with Price Waterhouse, Paul obtained his CPA (license inactive) and has a BA in Economics from UCLA.

Based: Los Angeles









Andy McCormac
Consulting CFO
Andy McCormac comes to Early Growth Financial Services with 15+ years of accounting and tax executive specializing in growth companies. Andy has senior level expertise in mergers and acquisitions and turnarounds and core strength in the areas of equity accounting, cash management, forecasting and budgeting, corporate tax, management and board of directors reporting, and more.

And has experience servicing multiple early and mid-stage companies as a part-time CFO, primarily in the technology and professional services industries. He was Chief Financial Officer at venture capital funded Storactive where he was responsible for preparing financial reporting for Management and the Board of Directors, tax planning and compliance, tax audits, due diligence as target, fundraising, and budgeting for both growth and contraction. He also supervised Risk Management, Information Technology and Human Resources. Prior to Storactive, he served as Controller at Event411.com.

Andy began his career in public accounting, moving up to Senior Tax Manager at KPMG. During his tenure, he served clients in the mortgage banking, banking, hospital and physician groups, consumer products and technology industries. Subsequently, he held senior positions at SEC reporting companies such as Countrywide Home Loans, and Quarterdeck Corporation.

He earned a Bachelor’s degree from the University of Southern California and is a CPA (inactive) in California. Andy is an avid tennis player, a Los Angeles Lakers fan, and lives near Venice Beach, California.

Based: Los Angeles









Vince McCord
Consulting CFO
Vince McCord has over thirty years of financial management and executive experience.  He has served as CFO for thirteen private, venture-backed startups and one public company. His expertise includes financial planning, financing, cash management, and contract negotiation.  He is also adept at managing functions outside of the financial arena including human resources, legal, information technology, and site facilities. 

He began his career at IBM as a computer marketing representative and then switched to finance where he held a variety of assignments including Manager of Financial Analysis for all storage products and software language and database products as well as Site Manager of Financial Analysis and Planning for the IBM San Jose Site.  He also created and led the financial planning organization for Conner Peripherals, the PC computer storage company that became the fastest growing manufacturing company in U.S. history.  As Corporate Controller of LSI Logic, the ASIC semiconductor pioneer, he architected the company's successful restructuring that resulted in a dramatic twenty-fold increase in the Company's share price.  He also negotiated the company's buyout of their manufacturing partner in Japan where he served on the joint venture's board of directors.

Highlights of his experience in the private arena, include  IntruVert Networks' successful acquisition by IT security leader, McAfee Associates and also the successful sale of three other private technology companies.  As a private company CFO, he has raised over $120 million of equity capital and $60 million of venture debt. 

Vince holds an MBA from the Harvard Business School and a BS in Applied Mathematics from Georgia Tech.

Based: Los Angeles









Rudy Barthelemy
Consulting CFO
Rudy Barthelemy joins Early Growth Financial Services (EGFS) with over 16 years of corporate finance and strategic advisory experience as an investment banker and management consultant. Rudy has worked with a wide variety of clients from Fortune 500 companies to early-stage startups. His areas of expertise include: equity and debt fundraising; mergers and acquisitions; transaction preparation and due diligence; financial planning and analysis; forecasting; budgeting; management reporting; and operational finance. Rudy has advised and executed over $3.2 billion in transaction value.

Rudy has experience in a wide range of industries including: software (SaaS), technology, consumer goods, apparel, media, telecom, electric automotive, business services, distribution, logistics, food and beverage, energy infrastructure, manufacturing and industrials.

Prior to joining EGFS Rudy was a Management Consultant and has advised Faraday Future, American Apparel, Inc., Westfield, Inc., Murad Inc., Telscape Communications, Inc., Radian Memory Systems Inc., Brandify, Inc. and Velocify, Inc., among others. Previously, Rudy was a Managing Director in Investment Banking at DelMorgan & Co., where he advised public and private companies on mergers and acquisitions and private placements of debt and equity.

Prior to DelMorgan & Co., Rudy began his investment banking career working at several leading global investment banks including: Barclays Capital, Morgan Stanley, and Bear Stearns, where he primarily focused on leveraged finance and mergers and acquisitions with private equity groups.

Rudy graduated cum laude with a B.A. in Economics from the University of Pennsylvania. While at UPenn Rudy was a member of the Varsity Track and Field and Cross Country teams and the Sprint Football team.

Based: Los Angeles









John Guenther
Consulting CFO
John has been a consulting CFO since 2015. He has served in various capacitates for several technology, media, and entertainment clients leading finance and accounting functions; budgeting and forecasting; metrics and KPI tracking and analysis; strategic transactions; and fundraising. John is comfortable talking GAAP, movies and TV, new technologies, sprint planning, pricing strategies, sports, app development, and everything in between.

John was the CFO of Sony Media Cloud Services (“MCS”) for four years. MCS was a small, subscription-based, SaaS company that began as an idea to disrupt traditional tape-based production workflows for the entertainment industry. John was there from the beginning helping incubate the idea; drive all business planning and modeling; feasibility, market and competitor analyses; partnership exploration; and funding alternatives. As CFO, John handled all financial requirements and served on the Management Committee advising on product design, engineering, business development, marketing, legal, pricing, and overall company strategy.

John spent eleven years at Sony Pictures Entertainment (“SPE”) where he helped executives for over one hundred departments optimize and expand operations, improve competitiveness and increase revenue and profit.

He led a wide range of projects, including creating file-based production and distribution systems for SPE content, developing 3D and 4K strategies and workflows, expanding production and post production capabilities and implementing various content protection and monetization initiatives.

Prior to joining Sony Pictures, John spent five years in investment banking and consulting focusing on media, entertainment and technology clients.

John holds a BS in Finance from Indiana University.

Based: Los Angeles









Sue Mulligan
Consulting CFO
Sue Mulligan is a licensed CPA who brings nearly 20 years of accounting and finance experience in her role as Chief Financial Officer for Early Growth Financial Services. Most recently, she started her own outsourced financial staffing firm providing finance and accounting services to start-ups and small companies. Her clients included software, hedge fund, investment banking and on-line education companies. She has been actively involved in fund raising for client companies and performing due diligence.

Prior to that, Sue was a CFO for a venture capital firm focused on high-tech and bio-tech industry. She managed the financials for the firm and worked their portfolio companies.

Sue has significant audit experience in both internal and external roles with the Tribune Companies and KPMG, respectively. She has also served on several international engagements in the systems consulting group.

Sue holds a B.S. in accounting from Marquette University. She is a licensed real estate broker and is actively involved in several charitable organizations.

Based: Chicago









Robert Loewer
Consulting CFO
Robert has 20+ years of global financial, legal and operational executive experience, including as an Owner, CFO, General Counsel and as a strategic and financial consultant to early-stage, middle-market and Fortune 500 companies.  He has an excellent track-record of building the infrastructure of start-up and growth companies and facilitating the growth of businesses of all sizes.  Robert has industry experience in technology, financial services, banking, bio-tech, clean energy, manufacturing, engineering, distribution, transportation, retail, MedTech, EdTech and others.  

His experiences and his MBA, JD, and Masters in Accounting (GPA 4.0/4.0) are very valuable in providing CFO services to early-stage companies, including financial reporting oversight, financial modeling, marketing and product analysis, pricing, budgeting, cash flow management, strategic planning, compensation planning, tax, valuation, due diligence and venture capital and debt fundraising.  A financial and legal background makes him adept with regulatory financial reporting and regulatory and legal compliance.  

He has quarterbacked and had hands-on responsibility for the strategic, financial, legal and operational elements of mergers & acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic alliances and multi-million dollar distribution, vendor and customer agreements. He has done business in 30+ countries, involving overseeing low-cost/high quality country sourcing and establishing operations and working with management teams on 4 continents.   

Robert’s operational expertise also includes: the build-out of finance, administrative, legal and other departments and the development and implementation of business processes and policies consistent with the owners, investors and founders’ vision.

Based: Chicago









Richard Duda
Fund-Level CFO
Rich comes to EGFS with 13 years of Accounting and Finance Operational experience in the Alternative Asset Management Industry.

He served as both Director and Controller of Fund Accounting for ff Venture Capital, a prominent seed and early stage venture capital firm investing in such industries as cybersecurity, artificial intelligence, drones, enterprise cloud software, and crowdfunding.  He was tasked with managing all daily transactional activity of the firm’s six managed funds and its management company.  In addition his responsibilities included budgeting, cash flow management, financial analysis, investor reporting, audit management, and tax management.  

Prior to that, he served as an Analyst at Vicis Capital, LLC, a multi-strategy hedge fund who had $6 Billion in Assets Under Management at its height.  At Vicis he managed the fund’s Private Placement portfolio, including performing corporate actions, valuations, and due diligence.  In addition, he managed the relationship with the firm’s Administrator, International Fund Service, with whom he began his career as an Associate.

Rich holds an MBA from Fordham University and a BS in Finance from St. John’s University.

Based: NYC









Jim Scott
Consulting CFO
James Scott has been growing technology companies since 1987, by defining strategy and implementing related tactical operational and financial planning and support to achieve success. James is a multi-industry pro with expertise in IT Manufacturing, Software, SaaS and IT Services and an architect of frameworks to empower managers, employees, vendors and customers to optimize stakeholder value creation. As CFO at a series of technology companies, James has experience successfully raising Private Equity and Venture Capital funding and providing the financial and operating plans to optimally grow those technology companies.

James’ executive experience includes: COOCFO for TetherView (start-up provider of Private Cloud Services to the SMB Market) and CFO at Binary Tree (IT Consulting Services, Enterprise Software, SaaS), V12Group (Marketing Services SaaS), ExpertPlan (Financial Services SaaS), and VLearn International (Online Learning SaaS). He was also the former Vice President of Finance and Administration at Spirent Communications (IT Manufacturing).

Early in his career, James was staff accountant for a series of companies whose growth strategy was in making strategic acquisitions. His role was to perform buy-side modeling, related due diligence and hands-on financial integration of the acquired companies. Not only was the role to create the model, but to make that model a reality. As both a Divisional and Plant Controller in manufacturing (Electronics Equipment, Glass Containers), his expertise in cost accounting and financial planning and analysis directly resulted in improved profitability and related value creation.

James’ foundation working with startup founders stems in part from joining an early stage electronics equipment manufacturer (then still located in a garage!), and growing it to successful exit. This exposed him to the unique challenges of growing from zero, fund raising, and the diligence side of the sale process.

James is a Certified Management Accountant, President of the NJ Shore Chapter of the Institute of Management Accountants, Ambassador for the New Jersey Technology Council, and New Jersey Technology Council CFO Hall of Fame Member. He holds his BA in Economics from Rutgers College and MBA in Finance from Rutgers Business School.

Based: New York City









Perry Panchmatia
Consulting CFO
Perry Panchmatia is a Senior Finance Analyst and Business Leader with over 10 years of experience helping to guide companies towards the achievement of profitable growth. His specialties include financial modeling and accounting controls, audit and tax compliance, corporate finance, financial management and cost accounting, contracts and due diligence negotiations.

Perry has worked for Fortune 500 organizations as well as small to medium-sized privately-held, venture-backed companies in a wide variety of industry sectors including technology, chemicals, telecommunications, and manufacturing.

Before joining EGFS, Perry filled the role of Senior Financial Analyst / Business Advisory at MISA Group / Nilefos West Inc. where he was involved in M&A, financial analysis, accounting system implementations, financial modeling, deal (equity and debt) structuring, and due diligence for various group companies and key startup projects.

Prior to that, as VP of Finance and Business Development at ACI Communications Inc., Perry was an active co-architect of acquisition, turnaround, offshoring, and growth strategies that successfully transformed a faltering division into a profitable, thriving company.

Based: Seattle






Markets
Industries
Leadership
CFO Team
Partnerships






chatCONTACT US today for a free consultation to discuss the financial pain points of your business.































Asia Growth | The Carlyle Group















        Skip to main navigation
      










Search


























 










Asia Growth










 









 Overview


The Asia Growth team targets small buyout and late-stage growth capital investments in China, India and Korea.





Carlyle Asia Growth Partners III







Launched in 2005 with $680 million, this is a sector-agnostic growth capital fund investing in private high growth companies with outstanding local management and leading market position in China, India, Japan and Korea.









Investment
Industry
Acquired
Status




 







 
Allsec Technologies LimitedAllsec Technologies Limited provides support services for inbound customer care, technology helpdesk and inbound/outbound help services. 
Technology & Business Services          
Aug 2006

Current          


 
Babela Restaurant Management Co., Ltd.Restaurant chain based in Shanghai and focused on Italian-style cuisine. 
Consumer & Retail          
Jul 2007

Exited          


 








China Forestry Holdings GroupChina Forestry Holdings Group is a forestry plantation operator in China. 
Industrial          
Jan 2008

Exited          


 







 
China Recycling Energy GroupChina Recycling Energy Group is a recovered-energy solution company engaged in the development, construction and operation of recovered energy power plants for large industrial plants such as cement, steel, petrochemical and glass factories. 
Energy & Power          
Nov 2007

Exited          


 







 
Claris Lifesciences LimitedClaris Lifesciences Limited manufactures and markets sterile parenteral preparations, life saving medicines and other hospital care products. Claris has a special focus on the delivery systems used for administering these drugs and has developed specialized products in that area. 
Healthcare          
Mar 2006

Exited          


 







 
Concord Medical Service Co.Concord Medical Service Co. is the largest woundless medical service network in China. Concord is a leader in the gamma knife operation field, a surgical device used to treat tumors with radiation therapy. 
Healthcare          
Nov 2007

Current          


 







 
Credit Orienwise GroupCredit Orienwise Group is the leading private loan guarantee provider in China. It has a 60% market share in Shenzhen and has established branch offices in Beijing, Shanghai, Changsha, Guangzhou and Fujian - it is the only private guarantor to have a nationwide footprint. Credit Orienwise aims to become China's leading non-banking financial institution providing full financing services to small and medium enterprises and consumers. 
Financial Services          
Mar 2006

Exited          


 
DIO F&B Co., Ltd.The largest coffee shop/leisure dining food and beverage chain in China. 
Consumer & Retail          
Dec 2007

Exited          


 







 
East River Biochemical GroupEast River Biochemical Group is a manufacturer of biochemical raw materials and biodiesel. 
Industrial          
Dec 2007

Exited          


 







 
Elitecore Technologies Ltd.Elitecore Technologies Ltd. is an IT products company focused on the fast-growing Internet security and the converged telecom billing solutions markets. 
Technology & Business Services          
Jun 2007

Exited          


 








FN STARS Co., Ltd.During the period of Carlyle's ownership, FN STARS Co., Ltd. was an independent distributor of financial services products in Korea. 
Financial Services          
Dec 2007

Exited          


 







 
GOL Offshore LimitedGOL Offshore Limited provides services to oil and gas companies to support their offshore E&P activities. 
Technology & Business Services          
Jul 2007

Current          


 







 
HaoYue Education GroupHaoYue Education Group is a private higher education service provider in China. 
Consumer & Retail          
Aug 2008

Current          


 







 
HongHua Group HoldingHongHua Group Holding is one of the largest land rig manufacturers in the world, specializing in the research, design and production of onshore rigs ranging from 2,000m - 7,000m of drilling depth. In addition to manufacturing drilling rigs and rig parts / components (e.g., mud pumps, masts, substructures, drawworks, drive systems and solids control systems), the company offers drilling-related training and after-sales support services to its customers. 
Energy & Power          
Dec 2006

Exited          


 
Kaisa Group Holdings Ltd.Kaisa Group Holdings Ltd. is a property developer mainly focusing on the residential sector in Shenzhen and the Pearl River Delta Area (PRD). The company’s strategy is to build its leading market position in Shenzhen and other PRD cities, while simultaneously seeking opportunistic expansions in the Yangtze River Delta and Pan-Bohai regions, as well as other select provincial capital cities in China. 
Real Estate          
Nov 2007

Exited          


 
Nakaya Microdevices CorporationOutsourced Semiconductor Assembly and Testing service provider 
Technology & Business Services          
Apr 2007

Exited          


 







 
NeWorld Education GroupNeWorld Education Group is one of the leading language training school chains in Eastern China and has established a strong brand name in providing Japanese language training, kids’ conversational English training, as well as high-end Mandarin training for foreign expatriates in China. 
Consumer & Retail          
Sep 2007

Exited          


 







 
Repco Home Finance LimitedRepco Home Finance Limited is a professionally managed housing finance company. 
Financial Services          
Dec 2007

Exited          


 







 
Shanghai Anxin Flooring Co., Ltd.Shanghai Anxin Flooring Co., Ltd. is the largest solid wood floor manufacturer in China. 
Industrial          
Jun 2006

Current          


 
Time Share Advertising & Communication Co. Ltd.Outdoor media company in China, providing custom billboard advertising nationwide. 
Telecom & Media          
Nov 2006

Exited          


 







 
TOPIA Education, Inc.TOPIA Education, Inc. is one of the largest after-school private education/tutoring institutes in Korea. 
Technology & Business Services          
Apr 2007

Exited          


 








Xtep (China) Company LimitedXtep (China) Company Limited is one of the largest fashion sportswear companies in China. 
Consumer & Retail          
Jul 2007

Exited          













Carlyle Asia Growth Partners IV







Launched in 2008 with $1.04 billion, this is a sector-agnostic growth capital fund investing in private high growth companies with outstanding local management and leading market position in China, India, Japan and Korea.









Investment
Industry
Acquired
Status




 







 
ArtGo Holdings LimitedArtGo Holdings Limited covers marble quarrying, fabrication, sales and mining investment. 
Technology & Business Services          
Jul 2012

Current          


 








ATMU, Inc.ATMU Inc. distributes and operates automated teller machines (ATM) in China. 
Technology & Business Services          
May 2010

Current          


 







 
China Agritech, Inc.China Agritech, Inc. develops, manufactures and distributes liquid and granular organic compound fertilizers. 
Industrial          
Oct 2009

Current          


 







 
Cyient LimitedCyient Limited is a leading provider of engineering services and network engineering. 
Technology & Business Services          
Jul 2012

Current          


 
Dee Development Engineers LimitedDEE Piping Systems Limited manufactures high pressure piping systems, induction pipe bends, and pipe fittings for thermal power plant projects, petroleum and natural gas projects, and process plant projects. 
Industrial          
Aug 2015

Current          


 







 
Edelweiss Financial Services LimitedEdelweiss operations straddle the entire spectrum of financial services in the wholesale and retail market segments including Credit, Capital Markets & Asset Management, Commodities and Life Insurance. 
Financial Services          
Oct 2011

Current          


 







 
EO Technics Co., Ltd.EO Technics Co., Ltd. is a global laser equipment engineering company with a speciality in developing and manufacturing low-power micro-machining laser equipment. 
Technology & Business Services          
May 2010

Exited          


 







 
Fu Shou Yuan International Group LimitedFu Shou Yuan International Group Limited is the largest provider of death care services in the PRC.
  
Consumer & Retail          
Dec 2013

Current          


 







 
GDC Technology LimitedGDC Tech is a supplier of digital cinema servers throughout Asia and a provider of digital cinema servers worldwide, serving its customers through offices in the US, Hong Kong, Japan, Singapore and China. 
Technology & Business Services          
Sep 2011

Current          


 







 
Guangxi Nanning Waterworks Co., LtdGuangxi Nanning Waterworks Company Limited supplies water and treats sewage. The Company's main products and services include providing Nanning city users with water and sewage services. 
 
Jun 2012

Exited          


 







 
iTour International Holdings LimitediTour International Holdings Limited is the second largest air-ticket consolidator in China. In addition to air-tickets, iTour offers travel related products including hotel bookings, vacation packages, travel insurance and corporate travel service. 
Consumer & Retail          
Nov 2009

Exited          


 







 
Jiangsu Rainbow Heavy Industries Co., Ltd Jiangsu Rainbow Heavy Industries Co., Ltd is a fast growing ship components, port and marine-related machinery producer in China. 
Industrial          
Sep 2009

Exited          


 







 
JIC Leasing Co., Ltd.JIC Leasing Co., Ltd. provides financing and leasing services 
Financial Services          
Oct 2015

Current          


 
Leyou, Inc.Largest multi-channel retailer for maternity, baby and kids’ products in China. 
Consumer & Retail          
Aug 2011

Current          


 
Max-Inf Holdings LimitedA leading producer of child car safety seats. 
Consumer & Retail          
Apr 2013

Current          


 







 
Newgen Knowledge Works Private LimitedNewgen Knowledge Works Pvt. Ltd. offers outsourced publishing services. The company was incorporated in 2004 and is based in Chennai, India. 
Technology & Business Services          
Nov 2014

Current          


 








Shenzhen Ellassay Fashion Co., Ltd.Shenzhen Ellassay Fashion Co., Ltd. is a vertically integrated fashion goods company. It is primarily engaged in the design, manufacturing, distribution and retail of women’s apparel in China under its own brands “Ellassay,” “Ellassay Weekend” and “Ellassay Shoes.” 
Consumer & Retail          
Oct 2008

Exited          


 







 
South Indian Bank Ltd., TheThe South Indian Bank is a private sector bank headquartered at Thrissur City in Kerala, India. South Indian Bank has 739 branches spread across more than 26 states and union territories in India. 
Financial Services          
Mar 2012

Current          


 







 
Tapex Co., Ltd.An adhesive tape and plastic wrap manufacturer. 
Industrial          
Jul 2013

Exited          


 







 
Tenwow International Holdings LimitedA leading Chinese packaged food and beverage distributor and producer. 
Consumer & Retail          
Sep 2013

Current          


 







 
Tirumala Milk Products Private LimitedTirumala Milk Products Private Limited  is a professionally managed company engaged in the manufacture of a wide range of Dairy Products which include Milk in Sachets, Sweets, Flavored Milk, Curd in Cups and Sachets, Milk Powder, Butter, Ghee and Butter Oil both in bulk as well as in consumer packs. 
Consumer & Retail          
May 2010

Exited          


 








Ucar Co., Ltd.During the period of Carlyle's ownership, Ucar was a nationwide used car retailer based on a franchise model that operated under a HKAG-sponsored certified pre-owned vehicle retail brand. 
Consumer & Retail          
Jun 2010

Exited          


 







 
Uju Electronics Co., LtdUju Electronics Co., Ltd. is the leader in Korea in high-precision fine-pitch electronic connectors for LCDs and mobile phones. 
Technology & Business Services          
Dec 2010

Exited          


 







 
VBHC Value Homes Private LimitedVertically integrated housing development company 
Real Estate          
Aug 2011

Current          


 







 
Visen Industries LimitedVisen Industries Limited is a large manufacturer of water-based polymer emulsions in India. 
Consumer & Retail          
Jun 2011

Current          


 







 
Yakjin Trading Corp.ODM/OEM apparel manufacturer. 
Industrial          
Dec 2013

Current          













Carlyle Asia Venture Partners







Launched in 2000 with $159 million, this fund targeted venture investment in emerging technology companies in Asia.













Carlyle Asia Venture Partners II







Launched in 2002 with $164 million, this fund sought venture and growth capital investment in fast growing companies across a variety of sectors in Asia.
















 Investment Approach
The Asia Growth team invests behind outstanding entrepreneurs and local management teams to fund high growth companies across a broad range of sectors with a geographic focus on China, India and Korea. 
The Asia Growth team deploys a country-specific strategy with an emphasis on acquiring significant minority or majority stakes in private companies with a track record of profitability and a potential for continued growth across industries where Carlyle has deep expertise. 
In China, the Asia Growth team focuses on high-growth sectors benefitting from the emergence of affluent Chinese middle class, demographic changes, structural reforms and demand for upgrade across all sectors.
In India, the Asia Growth team focuses on businesses in consumption or export-led sectors with attractive return ratios that benefit from sustained domestic demand for growth and/or India’s skill base and factor cost advantage across services and manufactured products.
In Korea, the Asia Growth team primarily focuses on small-cap buyouts and opportunistically targets minority positions with significant influence in companies with characteristics of strong growth and cash generation.
The regionally integrated team is comprised of seasoned investment professionals, each a local native to his/her respective country, spread across four offices in Beijing, Hong Kong, Mumbai and Seoul. The team's post-investment approach is to be a hands-on, long-term value-adding partner to the portfolio company CEO and senior management, leveraging the One Carlyle global network and resources to accelerate the growth of the portfolio companies through support in areas such as strategy formulation, business development, M&As, global expansion, fundraising, senior management recruitment and IPOs. 
The Asia Growth team is currently investing out of Carlyle Asia Growth Partners V, L.P. (CAGP V). . The team is also managing two predecessor funds,  the $680 million Carlyle Asia Growth Partners III, L.P. (CAGP III) launched in 2005, and the $1.04 billion Carlyle Asia Growth Partners IV, L.P. (CAGP IV) launched in 2008, for a total assets under management of approximately $1.1 billion.
 Team




Team Member
Title
Location
Industry




Tian Ai 
Vice President          
Beijing, China          
Generalist          


Lorin Chen 
Director          
Hong Kong, China          
 


Rishabh Chindalia  
Senior Associate          
Mumbai, India          
 


Manish Gaur 
Director          
Mumbai, India          
Generalist          


Jae Hyuk Hwang  
Associate          
Seoul, Korea          
 


Min Kim 
Vice President          
Seoul, Korea          
 


Sean Lu 
Managing Director          
Hong Kong, China          
Generalist          


Kapil Modi 
Vice President          
Mumbai, India          
 


Shankar Narayanan 
Managing Director          
Hong Kong, China          
Generalist          


Sang Pil (Philip) Park 
Managing Director          
Seoul, Korea          
Generalist          


Wayne Wen-Tsui Tsou 
Managing Director          
Hong Kong, China          
Generalist          


Julia Yang 
Director          
Beijing, China          
Generalist          


Aaron Zhang 
Vice President          
Shanghai, China          
 





 Case Study





Company
Industry
Acquired
Status




 








East River Biochemical Group 
Industrial          
Dec 2007
Zhejiang Province , China           
Exited          


 








Elitecore Technologies Ltd. 
Technology & Business Services          
Jun 2007
India          
Exited          


 








Xtep (China) Company Limited 
Consumer & Retail          
Jul 2007
China          
Exited          


 








Tirumala Milk Products Private Limited 
Consumer & Retail          
May 2010
India          
Exited          





































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











	China GDP Growth Rate | 2010-2017 | Data | Chart | Calendar | Forecast


























































  










TRADING
ECONOMICS





  





CALENDAR




Country Groups
Major Economies
All Countries

Countries
United States
Euro Area
United Kingdom
Germany
France
Canada
Australia
Japan
China

[+] More Countries


India
Brazil
Russia
South Africa
Indonesia

Continents
Africa
America
Asia
Europe

Markets
Earnings
Holidays






INDICATORS




Countries
United States
Euro Area
China
Japan
Germany
France
United Kingdom
Brazil
Russia
Italy
Canada
Australia
India
South Korea
Indonesia
Singapore
South Africa

[+] More Countries


Indicators
GDP Growth QoQ
GDP Growth YoY
Interest Rate
Inflation Rate
Jobless Rate
Debt to GDP
GDP Value
GDP Per Capita
Population
Balance of Trade
Current Account
Crude Oil Production
Forex Reserves

Credit Ratings
Latest News Stream
News by Country

[+] More Indicators






MARKETS

Currencies
Stocks
Commodities
Bonds



FORECASTS




Countries
United States
Euro Area
China
Japan
Germany
France
United Kingdom
Brazil
Russia
India
Canada
Australia
Singapore
South Africa
Indonesia

[+] More Countries


Markets
Currencies
Stocks
Commodities
Bonds

Indicators
                                    
GDP Growth
Interest Rate
Inflation Rate
Jobless Rate
Debt to GDP
Current Account
Population
GDP Per Capita

[+] More Indicators


























 APPS


 DATA
Download historical data for 20 million indicators using your browser.

Already a user? Login
                        

 ALERTS
                            Receive releases for indicators in your mail inbox and set alerts for markets.
                        

 API GATEWAY
Direct access to our calendar releases and historical data from your apps.


 IECONOMICS
Intelligent search to get instant answers with data and charts.


 UECONOMICS
Drag & drop charts and store your calendar preferences in a dashboad.
                            













China GDP Growth Rate  2010-2017 | Data | Chart | Calendar | Forecast
The Chinese economy advanced 1.7 percent quarter-on-quarter in the three months to March of 2017, stronger than a 1.3 percent expansion in the previous period and in line with market estimates. GDP Growth Rate in China averaged 1.83 percent from 2010 until 2017, reaching an all time high of 2.40 percent in the first quarter of 2011 and a record low of 1.30 percent in the first quarter of 2016.










                    Historical
                

Data
API
Alerts


                    Forecast
                












1Y
5Y
10Y
MAX









Column
Line
Area
Spline
Splinearea
Candlestick
Bars


Trend
Average(4)
Histogram
Variance
Mean
Maximum
Minimum






 Compare 


 Embed
                        



 Export Data
 API Access




OK






Please Paste this Code in your Website


<iframe src='https://tradingeconomics.com/embed/?s=cngdpqoq&v=201707231759v&h=300&w=600&ref=/china/gdp-growth' height='300' width='600'  frameborder='0' scrolling='no'></iframe><br />source: <a href='https://tradingeconomics.com/china/gdp-growth'>tradingeconomics.com</a>



width





height





 Preview
                                    












Receive the next reported value for China GDP Growth Rate in you Inbox









      Request Submitted. To add alerts for more indicators click here



We will not not share your email with third parties and you can unsubscribe at any time. 
    





                    Trading Economics members can view, download and compare data from nearly 200 countries, including more than 20 million economic indicators, exchange rates, government bond yields, stock indexes and commodity prices. 
                 


Learn More
Register
Login





                    The Trading Economics Application Programming Interface (API) provides direct access to our data. It allows API clients to download millions of rows of historical data, to query our real-time economic calendar, subscribe to updates and receive quotes for currencies, commodities, stocks and bonds.
                    

Learn More
Interested? Click here to contact us














                    Calendar
                GMT


                    Actual

                    Previous

                    Consensus

                    Forecast
                    




2017-01-20
02:00 AM

                Q4
            

                1.7%
            

                1.8%
            

                1.7%
            

                1.7%
            


2017-04-17
02:00 AM

                Q1
            

                1.3%
            

                1.7%
            

                1.6%
            

                1.7%
            


2017-07-17
02:00 AM

                Q2
            

                1.7%
            

                1.3%
            

                1.7%
            

                1.7%
            


2017-10-20
02:00 AM

                Q3
            



                1.7%
            



                1.4%
            



















China Economy Grows 1.7% QoQ In Q2, Matches Consensus










The Chinese economy advanced 1.7 percent quarter-on-quarter in the three months to March of 2017, stronger than a 1.3 percent expansion in the previous period and in line with market estimates.




	Year-on-year,  the economy advanced an annual 6.9 percent, the same as in the prior quarter while market expected a 6.8 percent expansion. Growth remained at its strongest level since the September quarter 2015. 




	For 2017, the Chinese government expects the economy to grow by around 6.5 percent; compared to a 6.7 percent expansion in 2016, which was the slowest growth in 26 years. 



National Bureau of Statistics l Rida Husna | rida@tradingeconomics.com

7/17/2017 8:19:40 AM





Recent Releases
                        



                            China Quarterly GDP Growth Weakest In A Year 
                        

The Chinese economy advanced 1.3 percent, following a 1.7 percent growth in the previous three months and missing market estimates of a 1.6 percent growth. It was the weakest expansion since the March quarter 2016.
Published on 2017-04-17



                            China Quarterly GDP Growth Weakest in 3 Quarters
                        

The Chinese economy advanced by 1.7 percent quarter-on-quarter in the fourth quarter of 2016, compared to a 1.8 percent growth in the previous three months and in line with market estimates.  It was the weakest expansion since the March quarter 2016.

Published on 2017-01-20



                            China Quarterly GDP Growth Eases Slightly to 1.8% in Q3
                        

The Chinese economy advanced by 1.8 percent quarter-on-quarter in the third quarter of 2016, compared to an upwardly revised 1.9 percent growth in the previous three months and in line with market estimates.


Published on 2016-10-19



                            Chinese Quarterly GDP Growth Strongest in 3 Quarters
                        

The Chinese economy expanded 1.8 percent quarter-on-quarter in the second quarter of 2016, accelerating from an upwardly revised 1.2 percent growth in the previous quarter and beating market expectations of a 1.6 percent expansion. It was the strongest expansion since the September quarter of 2015.

Published on 2016-07-15













                    China GDP
                

                    Last

                    Previous

                    Highest

                    Lowest

                    Unit






                    GDP Growth Rate
                

1.70
1.30
2.40
1.30


                    percent

[+]





                    GDP Annual Growth Rate
                

6.90
6.90
15.40
3.80


                    percent

[+]





                    GDP
                

11199.15
11064.66
11199.15
47.21


                    USD Billion

[+]





                    Gross National Product
                

742352.00
673837.10
742352.00
679.00


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    Gross Fixed Capital Formation
                

318911.50
292396.50
318911.50
80.70


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    GDP per capita
                

6894.50
6496.60
6894.50
132.00


                    USD

[+]





                    GDP per capita PPP
                

14400.90
13569.90
14400.90
1526.40


                    USD

[+]





                    GDP Constant Prices
                

381490.00
180683.00
744127.00
5262.80


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    GDP From Agriculture
                

21987.00
8654.00
63671.00
649.30


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    GDP From Construction
                

22326.30
8361.00
49522.00
181.90


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    GDP From Manufacturing
                

131243.70
61919.00
228974.00
2207.80


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    GDP From Services
                

206516.00
102024.00
384221.00
2212.70


                    CNY HML

[+]





                    GDP From Transport
                

17474.50
8105.00
33355.00
393.20


                    CNY HML

[+]














China GDP Growth Rate Notes


In China, the growth rate in GDP measures the change in the seasonally adjusted value of the goods and services produced by the Chinese economy during the quarter. As China’s traditional growth engines of manufacturing and construction are slowing down, services have emerged as the new driver. In the last few quarters strength in services and consumption helped to offset weaker manufacturing and exports.
. This page provides - China GDP Growth Rate - actual values, historical data, forecast, chart, statistics, economic calendar and news. China GDP Growth Rate - actual data, historical chart and calendar of releases - was last updated on  July of 2017.









                                Actual

                                Previous

                                Highest

                                Lowest

                                Dates

                                Unit

                                Frequency






1.70
1.30
2.40
1.30
2010 - 2017

                    percent

                    Quarterly








 Export Data
 API Access






gdp growth rate by Country
 



World
Europe
America
Asia
Africa
Australia
G20










Last 
Previous
Highest
Lowest








                                        United States
                                    

                                    2.60
                                
Jun/17
1.2
16.9
-10
%
Quarterly 





                                        China
                                    

                                    1.70
                                
Jun/17
1.3
2.4
1.3
%
Quarterly 





                                        India
                                    

                                    1.50
                                
Mar/17
1.5
6.2
-2.3
%
Quarterly 





                                        Turkey
                                    

                                    1.40
                                
Mar/17
3.8
5.6
-5.4
%
Quarterly 





                                        Brazil
                                    

                                    1.00
                                
Mar/17
-0.5
4
-3.9
%
Quarterly 





                                        Canada
                                    

                                    0.90
                                
Mar/17
0.7
3.33
-2.3
%
Quarterly 





                                        Spain
                                    

                                    0.90
                                
Jun/17
0.8
1.6
-1.6
%
Quarterly 





                                        Mexico
                                    

                                    0.70
                                
Mar/17
0.7
2.8
-6.2
%
Quarterly 





                                        Euro Area
                                    

                                    0.60
                                
Mar/17
0.5
1.3
-3
%
Quarterly 





                                        Germany
                                    

                                    0.60
                                
Mar/17
0.4
4
-4.5
%
Quarterly 





                                        South Korea
                                    

                                    0.60
                                
Jun/17
1.1
7.8
-7
%
Quarterly 





                                        France
                                    

                                    0.50
                                
Jun/17
0.5
7.7
-5
%
Quarterly 





                                        Italy
                                    

                                    0.40
                                
Mar/17
0.3
6
-2.9
%
Quarterly 





                                        Netherlands
                                    

                                    0.40
                                
Mar/17
0.6
1.7
-3.2
%
Quarterly 





                                        Australia
                                    

                                    0.30
                                
Mar/17
1.1
4.4
-2.1
%
Quarterly 





                                        Japan
                                    

                                    0.30
                                
Mar/17
0.3
3.2
-4.8
%
Quarterly 





                                        Switzerland
                                    

                                    0.30
                                
Mar/17
0.2
2.1
-1.9
%
Quarterly 





                                        United Kingdom
                                    

                                    0.30
                                
Jun/17
0.2
5
-2.7
%
Quarterly 





                                        Indonesia
                                    

                                    -0.34
                                
Mar/17
-1.77
4.01
-3.57
%
Quarterly 





                                        Russia
                                    

                                    -0.57
                                
Sep/15
-1.31
4.1
-5.4
%
Quarterly 












Related

China Economy Grows 1.7% QoQ In Q2, Matches Consensus
China GDP Growth Slightly Beats Estimates In Q2
China Trade Surplus Slightly Above Estimates In June
China Inflation Rate Stays At 4-Month High Of 1.5% In June
China Inflation Rate At 4-Month High Of 1.5% In May
China Trade Surplus Below Estimates In May
China Inflation Rate At 3-Month High Of 1.2% In April
China Trade Surplus Narrows In April
China Quarterly GDP Growth Weakest In A Year
China GDP Growth Beats Estimates In Q1
China Trade Surplus Narrows In March
China Inflation Rate Below Estimates In March
China Inflation Rate Slows To 2-Year Low In February
China Posts First Monthly Trade Gap In 3 Years
China Inflation Rate At 32-Month High Of 2.5% In January
China Trade Surplus Largest In A year
China Quarterly GDP Growth Weakest in 3 Quarters
China 2016 GDP Growth Weakest in 26 Years
China Trade Surplus Narrows to 8-Month Low in December
China Inflation Rate Eases to 2.1% in December













Latest

US Consumer Sentiment Remains At 9 Month Low
US GDP Grows 2.6% in Q2, Matches Forecasts
Brazil Jobless Rate Falls to 13% in Q2
Russia Holds Key Interest Rate at 9%
German Inflation Rate Stronger Than Expected in July
Swedish Q2 GDP Growth Strongest Since 2010
Spanish Inflation Rate Flat at 1.5% in July
Spanish Q2 GDP Growth at Near 2-Year High
French Inflation Rate Flat at 0.7% in July
French Economy Grows 0.5% in Q2
Singapore Jobless Rate Stays At 6-1/2-Year High In Q2
Japan Jobless Rate Retreats To 2.8% In June
Japan Inflation Rate Steady For 3rd Month At 0.4%
Mexico Trade Balance Swings to Surplus in June
US Durable Goods Orders Rise the Most in 3 Years
US Jobless Claims Rise More Than Expected
Turkey Holds Key Interest Rate at 8%
Hong Kong Trade Gap Widens Slightly In June
Spain Jobless Rate Drops To 8-1/2-year Low
South Korea Economy Expands 0.6% QoQ In Q2



























         China
    
United States
United Kingdom
Euro area
China
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
Andorra
Angola
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia
Botswana
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Costa Rica
Cote d Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Asia and Pacific
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Euro area
European Union
Europe and Central Asia
Faeroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Palestine
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of the Congo
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Samoa
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Asia
South Korea
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor Leste
Togo
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe





Calendar

Forecast

Indicators

News

Blog







  Markets
                        




Currency
Government Bond 10Y
Stock Market







  GDP
                        




GDP
GDP Annual Growth Rate
GDP Constant Prices
GDP From Agriculture
GDP From Construction
GDP From Manufacturing
GDP From Services
GDP From Transport
GDP Growth Rate
GDP per capita
GDP per capita PPP
Gross Fixed Capital Formation
Gross National Product







  Labour
                        




Employed Persons
Job Vacancies
Labour Costs
Minimum Wages
Population
Retirement Age Men
Retirement Age Women
Unemployed Persons
Unemployment Rate
Wages
Wages in Manufacturing







  Prices
                        




Consumer Price Index CPI
Core Consumer Prices
Core Inflation Rate
Export Prices
Food Inflation
GDP Deflator
Import Prices
Inflation Rate
Inflation Rate Mom
Producer Prices
Producer Prices Change







  Money
                        




Banks Balance Sheet
Cash Reserve Ratio
Central Bank Balance Sheet
Deposit Interest Rate
Fixed Asset Investment
Foreign Exchange Reserves
Interbank Rate
Interest Rate
Loan Growth
Loans To Banks
Loans to Private Sector
Money Supply M0
Money Supply M1
Money Supply M2
Reverse Repo Rate







  Trade
                        




Balance of Trade
Capital Flows
Crude Oil Production
Current Account
Current Account to GDP
Exports
Exports by Category
Exports by Country
Exports to India
External Debt
Foreign Direct Investment
Gold Reserves
Imports
Imports by Category
Imports by Country
Terms of Trade
Terrorism Index
Tourist Arrivals
Weapons Sales







  Government
                        




Credit Rating
Fiscal Expenditure
Government Budget
Government Budget Value
Government Debt to GDP
Government Revenues
Government Spending
Holidays
Military Expenditure







  Business
                        




Business Confidence
Car Production
Car Registrations
Cement Production
Changes in Inventories
Competitiveness Index
Competitiveness Rank
Composite Pmi
Corporate Profits
Corruption Index
Corruption Rank
Ease of Doing Business
Electricity Production
Industrial Production
Industrial Production Mom
Leading Economic Index
Manufacturing PMI
Manufacturing Production
Mining Production
Mni Business Sentiment
New Orders
Non Manufacturing PMI
Services PMI
Steel Production
Total Vehicle Sales







  Consumer
                        




Bank Lending Rate
Consumer Confidence
Consumer Credit
Consumer Spending
Disposable Personal Income
Gasoline Prices
Households Debt To Gdp
Mni Consumer Sentiment
Personal Savings
Retail Sales MoM
Retail Sales YoY







  Housing
                        




Home Ownership Rate
Housing Index







  Taxes
                        




Corporate Tax Rate
Personal Income Tax Rate
Sales Tax Rate
Social Security Rate
Social Security Rate For Companies
Social Security Rate For Employees





 




TRADING ECONOMICS

                    20.000.000 INDICATORS
                    50.000 MARKETS
                    196 COUNTRIES





HISTORICAL DATA
INDICATORS


ECONOMIC CALENDAR
FOREX


LIVE QUOTES
STOCKS


FORECASTS
COMMODITIES


RATINGS
BONDS




GET STARTED
 





 


            Free Alerts


        
            Receive reported values for your favourite economic indicators in your inbox the instant they get released.
        
        
         
        

Signup
 


It's a free service! We will never share your email with third parties. You can unsubscribe at any time. 
        





ANSWERS by IECONOMICS


China
China GDP Growth Rate
China vs United States

China vs China

China vs United Kingdom

China vs Euro Area

China vs Japan

China vs Australia



GDP Growth Rate
Countries with Highest GDP Growth Rate
Countries with Lowest GDP Growth Rate


        Forecasts
China GDP Growth Rate

China

GDP Growth Rate



More Answers







Like this page? Share it

Facebook  
    Twitter  
    Google+  
    LinkedIn










            TRADING ECONOMICS Supports the UN Refugee Agency
        

            DONATE

































